Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 6 Rhode Island Nonprofit Corporation Act
7-6-45.
Approval of merger or consolidation.

A plan of merger or consolidation is adopted in the following manner:

If the members of any merging or consolidating corporation are entitled to vote on it, the board of directors of the corporation shall adopt a resolution approving the proposed plan and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote on it, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written notice setting forth the proposed plan or a summary of the plan shall be given to each member entitled to vote at the meeting within the time and in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members. The proposed plan shall be adopted upon receiving at least a majority of the votes that members present at each meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.

If any merging or consolidating corporation has no members, or no members entitled to vote on it, a plan of merger or consolidation shall be adopted at a meeting of the board of directors of the corporation upon receiving the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

A limited-liability company party to a proposed merger or consolidation shall have the plan of merger or consolidation authorized and approved in the manner and by the vote required by §

7-16-21

.

A domestic limited partnership party to a proposed merger or consolidation shall have the plan of merger or consolidation, unless otherwise provided in the limited partnership agreement, authorized and approved in the manner and by the vote required by the laws of this state for mergers or consolidations of a domestic limited partnership with other limited partnerships or other business entities.

After approval, and at any time prior to the filing of the articles of merger or consolidation, the merger or consolidation may be abandoned pursuant to any provisions for abandonment set forth in the plan of merger or consolidation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 335, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

7-6-46.
Articles of merger or consolidation.

Upon approval, articles of merger or articles of consolidation shall duly be executed and shall set forth:

The plan of merger or the plan of consolidation;

If the members of any merging or consolidating corporation are entitled to vote on the plan, then as to each corporation:

A statement setting forth the date of the meeting of members at which the plan was adopted, that a quorum was present at the meeting, and that the plan received at least a majority of the votes that members present at the meeting or represented by proxy were entitled to cast; or

A statement that the plan was adopted by a consent in writing signed by all members entitled to vote on it;

If any merging or consolidating corporation has no members, or no members entitled to vote on the plan, then as to each corporation a statement of the fact, the date of the meeting of the board of directors at which the plan was adopted, and a statement of the fact that the plan received the vote of a majority of the directors in office;

A statement that the plan of merger was authorized and approved by each other constituent entity;

The effective date of the merger or consolidation if later than the date of filing of the articles of merger or consolidation;

The identity of the surviving entity or the new entity by name, type, and state or other jurisdiction under whose laws it is organized or formed.

The articles of merger or articles of consolidation shall be delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the articles conform to law, he or she shall, when all fees have been paid as prescribed in this chapter:

Endorse on the original the word “Filed,” and the month, day, and year of the filing;

File the original in the secretary of state’s office;

Issue a certificate of merger or a certificate of consolidation.

The certificate of merger or certificate of consolidation shall be delivered to the surviving or new entity, as the case may be, or its representative.

The articles of merger or consolidation shall act as a certificate of cancellation for each party to the merger or consolidation that is not the surviving entity or the new entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 4; P.L. 2021, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 335, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

7-6-47.
Effect of merger or consolidation.

Upon the issuance of the certificate of merger, or the certificate of consolidation by the secretary of state, the merger or consolidation is effected.

When the merger or consolidation has been effected:

The several parties to the plan of merger or consolidation are a single entity, that, in the case of a merger, is that entity designated in the plan of merger as the surviving entity, and, in the case of a consolidation, is the new entity provided for in the plan of consolidation.

The separate existence of all parties to the plan of merger or consolidation, except the surviving or new entity, ceases.

The surviving or new entity has all the rights, privileges, immunities, and powers and is subject to all the duties and liabilities of an entity organized under this chapter.

The surviving or new entity at that time and subsequently possesses all the rights, privileges, immunities, and franchises, of a public as well as of a private nature, of each of the merging or consolidating entities; and all property, real, personal, and mixed, and all debts due on any account, and all other choses in action. Every other interest, of or belonging to or due to each of the entities merged or consolidated, is deemed to be transferred to and vested in the single entity without further act or deed. The title to any real estate, or any interest in it, vested in any of the entities does not revert or become in any way impaired because of the merger or consolidation.

The surviving or new entity is from that time on responsible and liable for all the liabilities and obligations of each of the entities merged or consolidated. Any claim existing or action or proceeding pending by or against any of the entities may be prosecuted as if the merger or consolidation had not taken place, or the surviving or new entity may be substituted in its place. Neither the rights of creditors nor any liens upon the property of any entity is impaired by the merger or consolidation.

In the case of a merger, the articles of incorporation of the surviving entity are deemed to be amended to the extent that changes in its articles of formation are stated in the plan of merger. In the case of a consolidation, the statements set forth in the articles of consolidation and that are required or permitted to be set forth in the articles of incorporation of entities organized under this chapter are deemed to be the articles of incorporation of the new entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 335, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

7-6-48.
Merger or consolidation of domestic and foreign corporations.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in any general or public law, rule, or regulation, any two (2) or more entities, whether defined in §

7-6-2

, §

7-1.2-106

, §

7-13-1

, or §

7-16-2

, may be merged or consolidated in the following manner, if the merger or consolidation is permitted by the laws of the state under which each foreign entity is organized:

Each domestic entity shall comply with the provisions of this chapter regarding the merger or consolidation of domestic entities and each foreign entity shall comply with the applicable provisions of the laws of the state under which it is organized.

If the surviving or new entity is to be governed by the laws of any state other than this state, it shall comply with the provisions of this chapter with respect to foreign entities if it is to conduct affairs in this state, and in every case it shall file with the secretary of state of this state:

An agreement that it may be served with process in this state in any proceeding for the enforcement of any obligation of any domestic entity that is a party to the merger or consolidation; and

An irrevocable appointment of the secretary of state of this state as its agent to accept service of process in any proceeding.

The effect of the merger or consolidation shall be the same as in the case of the merger or consolidation of domestic entities, if the surviving or new entity is to be governed by the laws of this state. If the surviving or new entity is to be governed by the laws of any state other than this state, the effect of the merger or consolidation is the same as in the case of the merger or consolidation of domestic entities except insofar as the laws of the other state provide otherwise.

After approval by the members or, if there are no members entitled to vote on it, by the board of directors, and at any time prior to the filing of the articles of merger or consolidation, the merger or consolidation may be abandoned pursuant to provisions for abandonment set forth in the plan of merger or consolidation.

This section does not apply to insurance holding company systems as defined in §

27-35-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 4; P.L. 2021, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 335, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

7-6-48.1.
Conversion of other entities to a domestic nonprofit corporation.

As used in this section, the term “other entity” means a foreign corporation or domestic or foreign unincorporated entity no part of the income or profit of which is distributable to its members, directors, or officers.

Any other entity may convert to a nonprofit corporation of this state by complying with subsection (h) of this section and filing in the office of the secretary of state:

A certificate of conversion to corporation (nonprofit) that has been executed in accordance with subsection (i) of this section and filed in the office of the secretary of state in accordance with §

7-6-48.2

; and

Articles of incorporation that have been executed, acknowledged and filed in accordance with §

7-6-35

.

The certificate of conversion to corporation (nonprofit) shall state:

The date on which, and the jurisdiction where, the other entity was first created, incorporated, formed, or otherwise came into being and, if it has changed, its jurisdiction immediately prior to its conversion to a domestic corporation;

The name and type of the other entity immediately prior to the filing of the certificate of conversion to corporation (nonprofit); and

The name of the corporation as set forth in its articles of incorporation filed in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.

Upon the effective time of the certificate of conversion to corporation (nonprofit) and the articles of incorporation, the other entity shall be converted to a corporation of this state and the corporation shall thereafter be subject to all of the provisions of this title, except that notwithstanding §

7-6-36

, the existence of the corporation shall be deemed to have commenced on the date the other entity commenced its existence in the jurisdiction in which the other entity was first created, formed, incorporated, or otherwise came into being.

The conversion of any other entity to a corporation of this state shall not be deemed to affect any obligations or liabilities of the other entity incurred prior to its conversion to a corporation of this state or the personal liability of any person incurred prior to the conversion.

When another entity has been converted to a corporation of this state pursuant to this section, the corporation of this state shall, for all purposes of the laws of the state, be deemed to be the same entity as the converting other entity. When any conversion shall have become effective under this section, for all purposes of the laws of the state, all of the rights, privileges and powers of the other entity that has converted, and all property, real, personal, and mixed, and all debts due to the other entity, as well as all other things and causes of action belonging to the other entity, shall remain vested in the domestic corporation to which the other entity has converted and shall be the property of the domestic corporation and title to any real property vested by deed or otherwise in the other entity shall not revert to the other entity or be in any way impaired by reason of this chapter; but all rights of creditors and all liens upon any property of the other entity shall be preserved unimpaired, and all debts, liabilities, and duties of the other entity that has converted shall remain attached to the corporation of this state to which the other entity has converted, and may be enforced against it to the same extent as if the debts, liabilities, and duties had originally been incurred or contracted by it in its capacity as a corporation of this state. The rights, privileges, powers, and interests in property of the other entity, as well as the debts, liabilities, and duties of the other entity, shall not be deemed, as a consequence of the conversion, to have been transferred to the domestic corporation to which the other entity has converted for any purpose of the laws of the state.

Unless otherwise agreed for all purposes of the laws of the state, or as required under applicable non-Rhode Island law, the converting other entity shall not be required to wind up its affairs or pay its liabilities and distribute its assets, and the conversion shall not be deemed to constitute a dissolution of the other entity and shall constitute a continuation of the existence of the converting other entity in the form of a corporation of this state.

Prior to filing a certificate of conversion to corporation (nonprofit) with the office of the secretary of state, the conversion shall be approved in the manner provided for by the document, instrument, agreement, or other writing, as the case may be, governing the internal affairs of the other entity and the conduct of its business or by applicable law, as appropriate, and articles of incorporation shall be approved by the same authorization required to approve the conversion.

The certificate of conversion to corporation (nonprofit) shall be signed by any person who is authorized to sign the certificate of conversion to corporation (nonprofit) on behalf of the other entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 232, § 2, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 335, § 2, effective July 9, 2021.

7-6-48.2.
Filing of certificate of conversion to corporation (nonprofit).

The certificate of conversion to corporation (nonprofit) shall be delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the certificate of conversion to corporation (nonprofit) conforms to law, the secretary of state shall, when all fees have been paid as prescribed in subsection (b) of this section:

Endorse on the original the word “Filed,” and the month, day, and year of the filing;

File the original in the secretary of state’s office; and

Issue a certificate of conversion to corporation (nonprofit).

The secretary of state shall charge and collect for filing a certificate of conversion (nonprofit), twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

The certificate of conversion to corporation (nonprofit) shall be delivered to the corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 232, § 2, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 335, § 2, effective July 9, 2021.

7-6-48.3.
Conversion of a domestic nonprofit corporation to other entities.

A nonprofit corporation of this state may, upon the authorization of a conversion in accordance with this section, convert to a limited-liability company, business trust or association, real estate investment trust, common-law trust, or any other unincorporated business or entity, including a partnership (whether general or limited, including a registered limited-liability partnership) or a foreign corporation.

If the members of the converting corporation are entitled to vote on it, the board of directors of the corporation shall adopt a resolution, specifying the type of entity into which the corporation shall be converted, the terms and conditions of the conversion, and recommending the approval of such conversion by directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote on it, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written notice setting forth the proposed conversion shall be given to each member entitled to vote at the meeting within the time and in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members. The conversion shall be adopted upon receiving at least a majority of the votes that members present at each meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.

If any converting corporation has no members, or no members entitled to vote on it, a resolution for conversion shall be adopted at a meeting of the board of directors of the corporation upon receiving the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

The corporation shall file with the secretary of state a certificate of conversion to non-Rhode Island entity, executed by its president and vice president and by its secretary or an assistant secretary, that certifies:

The name of the corporation, and if it has been changed, the name under which it was originally incorporated;

The date of filing of its original articles of incorporation with the secretary of state;

The name and jurisdiction of the entity and type of entity to which the corporation shall be converted;

That the conversion has been approved in accordance with the provisions of this section;

The agreement of the corporation that it may be served with process in the state of Rhode Island in any action, suit, or proceeding for enforcement of any obligation of the corporation arising while it was a corporation of this state, and that it irrevocably appoints the secretary of state as its agent to accept service of process in any such action, suit, or proceeding; and

The address to which a copy of the process referred to in subsection (d)(5) of this section shall be mailed to it by the secretary of state. In the event of service upon the secretary of state in accordance with subsection (d)(5) of this section, the secretary of state shall forthwith notify the corporation that has converted out of the state of Rhode Island by letter, certified mail, return receipt requested, directed to the corporation that has converted out of the state of Rhode Island at the address so specified, unless the corporation shall have designated in writing to the secretary of state a different address for this purpose, in which case it shall be mailed to the last address designated. The letter shall enclose a copy of the process and any other papers served on the secretary of state pursuant to this subsection. It shall be the duty of the plaintiff in the event of service to serve process and any other papers in duplicate; to notify the secretary of state that service is being effected pursuant to this subsection; and to pay the secretary of state the sum of fifteen dollars ($15.00) for the use of the state, which sum shall be taxed as part of the costs in the proceeding, if the plaintiff shall prevail therein. The secretary of state shall maintain an alphabetical record of any service setting forth the name of the plaintiff and the defendant; the title, docket number, and nature of the proceeding in which process has been served; the fact that service has been effected pursuant to this subsection; the return date thereof; and the day and hour service was made. The secretary of state shall not be required to retain such information longer than five (5) years from receipt of the service of process.

Upon the filing in the office of the secretary of state of a certificate of conversion to non-Rhode Island entity in accordance with subsection (d) of this section, or upon the future effective date or time of the certificate of conversion to non-Rhode Island entity and payment to the secretary of state of all fees prescribed under this title, the secretary of state shall certify that the corporation has filed all documents and paid all fees required by this title, and thereupon the corporation shall cease to exist as a corporation of this state at the time the certificate of conversion becomes effective. The certificate of the secretary of state shall be prima facie evidence of the conversion by the corporation out of the state.

The conversion of a corporation out of the state in accordance with this section and the resulting cessation of its existence as a corporation of this state pursuant to a certificate of conversion to non-Rhode Island entity shall not be deemed to affect any obligations or liabilities of the corporation incurred prior to such conversion or the personal liability of any person incurred prior to such conversion, nor shall it be deemed to affect the choice of law applicable to the corporation with respect to matters arising prior to such conversion.

Unless otherwise provided in a resolution of conversion adopted in accordance with this section, the converting corporation shall not be required to wind up its affairs or pay its liabilities and distribute its assets, and the conversion shall not constitute a dissolution of such corporation.

When a corporation has been converted to another entity or business form pursuant to this section, the other entity or business form shall, for all purposes of the laws of the state, be deemed to be the same entity as the corporation. When any conversion shall have become effective under this section, for all purposes of the laws of the state, all of the rights, privileges, and powers of the corporation that has converted, and all property, real, personal, and mixed, and all debts due to the corporation, as well as all other things and causes of action belonging to the corporation, shall remain vested in the other entity or business form to which the corporation has converted and shall be the property of the other entity or business form, and the title to any real property vested by deed or otherwise in the corporation shall not revert to the corporation or be in any way impaired by reason of this chapter; but all rights of creditors and all liens upon any property of the corporation shall be preserved unimpaired, and all debts, liabilities, and duties of the corporation that has converted shall remain attached to the other entity or business form to which the corporation has converted, and may be enforced against it to the same extent as if the debts, liabilities, and duties had originally been incurred or contracted by it in its capacity as the other entity or business form. The rights, privileges, powers, and interest in property of the corporation that has converted, as well as the debts, liabilities, and duties of the corporation, shall not be deemed, as a consequence of the conversion, to have been transferred to the other entity or business form to which such corporation has converted for any purposes of the laws of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 232, § 2, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 335, § 2, effective July 9, 2021.

7-6-48.4.
Filing of certificate of conversion to corporation (nonprofit).

The certificate of conversion to corporation (nonprofit) shall be delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the certificate of conversion to corporation (nonprofit) conforms to law, the secretary of state shall, when all fees have been paid as prescribed in subsection (b) of this section:

Endorse on the original the word “Filed,” and the month, day, and year of the filing;

File the original in the secretary of state’s office; and

Issue a certificate of conversion to corporation (nonprofit).

The secretary of state shall charge and collect for filing a certificate of conversion (nonprofit), twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

The certificate of conversion to corporation (nonprofit) shall be delivered to the corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 232, § 2, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 335, § 2, effective July 9, 2021.

7-6-49.
Sale, lease, exchange, or mortgage of assets.

A sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, the property and assets of a corporation may be made upon the terms and conditions and for the consideration, which may consist in whole or in part of money or property, real or personal, including shares of any corporation for profit, domestic or foreign, that is authorized in the following manner:

If there are members entitled to vote on it, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending the sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, or other disposition and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote on it, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written notice stating that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, the property and assets of the corporation shall be given to each member entitled to vote at the meeting, within the time and in the manner provided by this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members. At the meeting the members may authorize the sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, or other disposition and may fix, or may authorize the board of directors to fix, any or all of the terms and conditions of the disposition and the consideration to be received by the corporation for it. The authorization shall require at least a majority of the votes that members present at the meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast. After the authorization by a vote of members, the board of directors, nevertheless, in its discretion, may abandon the sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, or other disposition of assets, subject to the rights of third parties under any contracts relating to the disposition of the assets, without further action or approval by members.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote on it, a sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, the property and assets of a corporation is authorized upon receiving the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-50.
Voluntary dissolution.

A corporation may dissolve and wind up its affairs in the following manner:

If there are members entitled to vote on dissolution, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending that the corporation be dissolved, and directing that the question of the dissolution be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote on it, which may be either an annual or special meeting. Written notice stating that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the advisability of dissolving the corporation, shall be given to each member entitled to vote at the meeting, within the time and in the manner provided by this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members. A resolution to dissolve the corporation is adopted upon receiving at least a majority of the votes that members present at the meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote on dissolution, the dissolution of the corporation shall be authorized at a meeting of the board of directors upon the adoption of a resolution to dissolve by the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

Upon the adoption of the resolution by the members, or by the board of directors if there are no members or no members entitled to vote on dissolution, the corporation shall cease to conduct its affairs except to the extent necessary for the winding up of its affairs, shall immediately mail a notice of the proposed dissolution to each known creditor of the corporation, and shall proceed to collect its assets and apply and distribute them as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-51.
Distribution of assets.

The assets of a corporation in the process of dissolution shall be applied and distributed as follows:

All liabilities and obligations of the corporation shall be paid and discharged, or adequate provision shall be made for their payment and discharge;

Assets held by the corporation upon condition requiring return, transfer, or conveyance, which condition occurs by reason of the dissolution, shall be returned, transferred, or conveyed in accordance with the requirements;

Assets received and held by the corporation subject to limitations permitting their use only for charitable, religious, eleemosynary, benevolent, educational, or similar purposes, but not held upon a condition requiring return, transfer, or conveyance by reason of the dissolution, shall be transferred or conveyed to one or more domestic or foreign corporations, societies, or organizations engaged in activities substantially similar to those of the dissolving corporation, pursuant to a plan of distribution adopted as provided in this chapter or as otherwise provided in its articles of incorporation or bylaws;

Any other assets shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions of the articles of incorporation or the bylaws to the extent that the articles of incorporation or bylaws determine the distributive rights of members, or any class or classes of members, or provide for distribution to others;

Any remaining assets may be distributed to any persons, societies, organizations, or domestic or foreign corporations, whether for profit or nonprofit, that may be specified in a plan of distribution adopted as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-52.
Plan of distribution.

A plan providing for the distribution of assets, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, may be adopted by a corporation in the process of dissolution and shall be adopted by a corporation for the purpose of authorizing any transfer or conveyance of assets for which this chapter requires a plan of distribution, in the following manner:

If there are members entitled to vote on the plan, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending a plan of distribution and directing its submission to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote on it, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written notice setting forth the proposed plan of distribution or a summary of it shall be given to each member entitled to vote at the meeting, within the time and in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members. The plan of distribution shall be adopted upon receiving at least a majority of the votes that members present at the meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote on it, a plan of distribution shall be adopted at a meeting of the board of directors upon receiving a vote of a majority of the directors in office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-53.
Revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings.

A corporation may, at any time prior to the issuance of a certificate of dissolution by the secretary of state, revoke the action previously taken to dissolve the corporation, in the following manner:

If there are members entitled to vote on it, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending that the voluntary dissolution proceedings be revoked, and directing that the question of the revocation be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote on it, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written notice stating that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the advisability of revoking the voluntary dissolution proceedings, shall be given to each member entitled to vote at the meeting, within the time and in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members. A resolution to revoke the voluntary dissolution proceedings shall be adopted upon receiving at least a majority of the votes that members present at the meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote on it, a resolution to revoke the voluntary dissolution proceedings shall be adopted at a meeting of the board of directors upon receiving the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

Upon the adoption of the resolution by the members, or by the board of directors where there are no members or no members entitled to vote on it, the corporation may at that time again conduct its affairs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-54.
Articles of dissolution.

If voluntary dissolution proceedings have not been revoked, then when all debts, liabilities, and obligations of the corporation have been paid and discharged, or adequate provision has been made for them, and all of the remaining property and assets of the corporation have been transferred, conveyed, or distributed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, articles of dissolution shall be executed in duplicate by the corporation by its president or a vice president, and by its secretary or an assistant secretary, and shall set forth:

The name of the corporation;

If there are members entitled to vote on the dissolution:

A statement setting forth the date of the meeting of members at which the resolution to dissolve was adopted, that a quorum was present at the meeting, and that the resolution received at least a majority of the votes that members present at the meeting or represented by proxy were entitled to cast; or

A statement that the resolution was adopted by a consent in writing signed by all members entitled to vote on it;

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote on the dissolution, a statement of the fact, the date of the meeting of the board of directors at which the resolution to dissolve was adopted, and a statement of the fact that the resolution received the vote of a majority of the directors in office;

That all debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation have been paid and discharged or that adequate provision has been made for their payment;

A copy of the plan of distribution as adopted by the corporation, or a statement that no plan was adopted;

That all the remaining property and assets of the corporation have been transferred, conveyed, or distributed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;

That there are no suits pending against the corporation in any court, or that adequate provision has been made for the satisfaction of any judgment, order, or decree that may be entered against it in any pending suit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-55.
Filing of articles of dissolution.

The articles of dissolution shall be delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the articles of dissolution conform to law, the secretary of state shall, when all fees have been paid as prescribed in this chapter:

Endorse on the original the word “Filed”, and the month, day, and year of the filing;

File the original in the secretary of state’s office;

Issue a certificate of dissolution.

The certificate of dissolution shall be delivered to the representative of the dissolved corporation. Upon the issuance of the certificate of dissolution the existence of the corporation ceases, except for the purpose of suits, other proceedings, and appropriate corporate action by members, directors, and officers as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 4.

7-6-56.
Revocation of certificate of incorporation.

The certificate of incorporation of a corporation may be revoked by the secretary of state upon the conditions prescribed in this section when it is established that:

The corporation procured its articles of incorporation through fraud;

The corporation has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law;

The corporation has failed to file its annual report within the time required by this chapter, or has failed to pay any fees, when they have become due and payable;

The corporation has failed for 30 days to appoint and maintain a registered agent in this state as required by this chapter;

The corporation has failed, after change of its registered office or registered agent, to file in the office of the secretary of state a statement of the change as required by this chapter;

The corporation has failed to file in the office of the secretary of state any amendment to its articles of incorporation or any articles of merger within the time prescribed by this chapter; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other document submitted by the corporation pursuant to this chapter.

No certificate of incorporation of a corporation shall be revoked by the secretary of state unless:

The secretary of state shall have given the corporation not less than sixty (60) days notice thereof by regular mail addressed to the registered office of the corporation in this state on file with the secretary of state’s office; provided, however, that if a prior mailing addressed to the registered office of the corporation in this state currently on file with the secretary of state’s office has been returned to the secretary of state as undeliverable by the United States Postal Service for any reason, or if the revocation notice is returned as undeliverable to the secretary of state’s office by the United States Postal Service for any reason, the secretary of state shall give notice as follows:

To the corporation at its principal office of record as shown in its most recent annual report, and no further notice shall be required; or

In the case of a domestic corporation that has not yet filed an annual report, then to any one of the incorporators listed on the articles of incorporation, and no further notice shall be required; and

The corporation fails prior to revocation to file the annual report or pay the fees, or file the required statement of change of registered agent or registered office, or file the articles of amendment or articles of merger, or correct the misrepresentation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 26, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 268, § 2.